Missouri, session 2026, SB1343.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 227.856, to read as
follows:
227.856. The portion of State Highway D from State
Highway 94 continuing west to State Highway T in St. Charles
County shall be designated as "President Donald J Trump
Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and
maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with
the costs to be paid by private donations.
✓